Utah statutes.
10-6-158.   Financial administration ordinance -- Adoption -- Purpose.
The governing body under the council-mayor optional form of government shall,
and the governing body of any other city may, adopt a financial administration
ordinance, which would, with appropriate budgetary controls, authorize the
mayor, director of finance, or other official approved by the council, to act
as the financial officer for the purpose of approving:
(1)  payroll checks, if the checks are prepared in accordance with a salary
schedule established in a personnel ordinance or resolution; or
(2)  routine expenditures, such as utility bills, payroll-related expenses,
supplies, materials, and payments on city-approved contracts and capital
expenditures which were referenced in the budget document and approved by an
appropriation resolution adopted for the current fiscal year.
